Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 3. Brokers-Dealers, Investment Advisors, Investment Advisor Representatives and Agents.

§ 13.1-504.
Registration.

It shall be unlawful for any person to transact business in this Commonwealth as (i) a broker-dealer or an agent, except in transactions exempted by subsection B of §

13.1-514

, unless he is so registered under this chapter; (ii) an investment advisor or investment advisor representative unless he is so registered under this chapter; or (iii) a federal covered advisor unless he has filed such documents and paid such fee as the Commission by rule or order may require.

The registration of an agent shall be deemed effective only so long as he is connected with a specified broker-dealer registered under this chapter or a specified issuer. When an agent begins or terminates a connection with a broker-dealer or issuer, both the agent and the broker-dealer or issuer shall promptly notify the Commission. An agent who changes his connection from one broker-dealer or issuer to another shall be required to file a new application for registration and pay the necessary fee in accordance with §

13.1-505

. It shall be unlawful for any broker-dealer or issuer to employ an unregistered agent. No agent shall be employed by more than one broker-dealer or issuer, except pursuant to such rules or regulations as the Commission shall prescribe.

The registration of an investment advisor representative shall be deemed effective only so long as he is connected with an investment advisor registered under this chapter or a federal covered advisor. When an investment advisor representative begins or terminates a connection with an investment advisor, the investment advisor shall promptly notify the Commission. When an investment advisor representative begins or terminates a connection with a federal covered advisor, the investment advisor representative shall promptly notify the Commission. An investment advisor representative who changes his connection from one investment advisor or federal covered advisor to another shall be required to file a new application for registration and pay the necessary fee in accordance with §

13.1-505

. It shall be unlawful for (i) any person who is required to be registered as an investment advisor under this chapter to employ an unregistered investment advisor representative or (ii) a federal covered advisor to employ, supervise, or associate with an unregistered investment advisor representative having a place of business in the Commonwealth. No investment advisor representative shall be employed by more than one investment advisor or federal covered advisor except pursuant to such rules or regulations as the Commission shall prescribe.

History.

1956, c. 428; 1974, cc. 374, 479; 1979, c. 312; 1982, c. 407; 1987, c. 678; 1991, cc. 223, 281, 418; 1997, c. 279; 1998, cc. 22, 255; 2003, c. 595; 2007, c. 458.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendment by c. 22, in subsection A, in the first sentence, deleted “or” preceding “(ii) an investment advisor” and added “or (iii) a federal covered advisor unless he has filed such documents and paid such fees as the Commission by rule or order may require.”

The 1998 amendment by c. 255, in subsection C, in the first sentence, substituted “an investment advisor” for “a specified investment advisor” and deleted “specified” preceding “federal covered advisor,” inserted “or federal covered advisor” in the fourth sentence, and added “except pursuant to such rules or regulations as the Commission shall prescribe” in the last sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 595 deleted the former last sentence of subsection A, which read: “Notwithstanding the exclusion provided by clause (vi) of §

13.1-501

in the definition of ‘investment advisor,’ for the period ending three years from October 11, 1996, the Commission may require the registration as an investment advisor of any federal covered advisor who fails or refuses to pay a fee required by this chapter or rule promulgated pursuant to this chapter; provided, that a delay in payment or an underpayment of a fee that is remedied within fifteen days after receipt of notice from the Commission shall not constitute a failure or refusal to pay the fee.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 458 added the exception at the end of the last sentence in subsection B.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1464 (1974).

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1370 (1976).

For article, “The Applicability of Local Securities Acts to Multi-State Securities Transactions,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 139 (1985).

For essay, “Investment Analysis and the Law of Insider Trading,” see 76 Va. L. Rev. 1023 (1990).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3A M.J. Brokers, § 4.

§ 13.1-504.1.
Brokerage services of savings and loan associations, savings banks or service corporations of either; when registration not required.

A savings and loan association or a savings bank, or the service corporation of either, may enter into an agreement with any person or entity which is a registered broker-dealer under the applicable provisions of this chapter and under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, for the purpose of making brokerage services available to customers of the association or savings bank. The existence of such an agreement shall not of itself be sufficient to require employees of the association, savings bank or service corporation to register as an agent under the provisions of this article, so long as the employees’ activities with regard to such brokerage services are limited to the providing of clerical or ministerial services.

History.

1984, c. 334.

§ 13.1-504.2.
Broker-dealer services provided by credit unions; when registration not required.

A credit union may enter into an agreement with any person or entity which is a registered broker-dealer under this chapter and under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, for the purpose of making brokerage services available to members of the credit union. The existence of such an agreement shall not of itself be sufficient to require employees of the credit union to register as an agent under the provisions of this article, so long as the employees’ activities with regard to such brokerage services are limited to the providing of clerical or ministerial services.

History.

1988, c. 338.

§ 13.1-505.
Procedure for registration.

A broker-dealer, investment advisor, investment advisor representative or agent may be registered after filing with the Commission, or any entity designated by order or rule of the Commission, an application containing such relevant information as the Commission may require. He shall be registered if the Commission finds that:

He is a person (and, in the case of a corporation or partnership, the natural persons who are the officers, directors or partners or who otherwise control such corporation or partnership are persons) of good character and reputation;

He intends to maintain his business records in accordance with the rules of the Commission;

His business knowledge and conduct and his financial responsibility are such that he is a suitable person to engage in the business;

He has supplied all information required by the Commission;

He is not subject to the revocation provisions of §

13.1-506

; and

He has paid the necessary fee.

The Commission may require as a condition of registration or renewal of registration the filing by a broker-dealer or investment advisor of a reasonable surety or other bond conditioned as the Commission may require for the protection of investors not in any case exceeding $25,000 in penalty amount as evidence of financial responsibility except that no bond shall be required where the net worth of the broker-dealer or investment advisor exceeds $25,000.

The Commission may require as a condition of registration the passing of a written examination as evidence of knowledge of the securities or investment advisory business.

All registrations and renewals thereof shall expire annually in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Commission.

Each application for a renewal of a registration shall be filed with the Commission or any entity designated by order or rule of the Commission. Upon application for a renewal of a registration, the Commission shall have jurisdiction to determine, as of such time, the propriety of the renewal registration.

Each application for a registration or renewal of a registration as a broker-dealer or investment advisor shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of $200, payable to the Treasurer of Virginia or any entity designated by order or rule of the Commission.

Each application for a registration or renewal of a registration as an agent or investment advisor representative shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of not less than thirty and not more than fifty dollars, as established by order or rule of the Commission, payable to the Treasurer of Virginia or any entity designated by order or rule of the Commission.

For the purposes of registration as a broker-dealer or an investment advisor, a partnership shall be treated as the same partnership so long as two or more members of the partnership named in the application continue the business without change of location, if the partnership, within one month after a change in the partnership, files with the Commission a copy of a certificate filed in compliance with §

50-74

.

The Commission shall either grant or deny each application for registration within thirty days after it is filed. However, if additional time is needed to obtain or verify information regarding the application, the Commission may extend such period as much as ninety days by giving written notice to the applicant. No more than three such extensions may be made on any one application. An extension of the initial thirty-day period, not to exceed ninety days, shall be granted upon written request of the applicant.

A renewal of registration shall be granted as a matter of course upon receipt of the proper application and fee together with any surety bond that the Commission may pursuant to subsection B require unless the registration was, or the renewal would be, subject to revocation under §

13.1-506

.

History.

1956, c. 428; 1974, cc. 382, 479; 1980, c. 222; 1981, c. 244; 1984, c. 771; 1987, c. 678; 1990, c. 5; 1991, c. 281; 1992, c. 18; 1997, c. 279.

Editor’s note.

Section

50-74

, which is referred to at the end of subsection H, was repealed by Acts 1996, c. 292. For provisions of the Uniform Partnership Act generally, which was enacted by Acts 1996, c. 292, see §

50-73.79

et seq.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1464 (1974).

§ 13.1-505.1.
Post-registration provisions.

With respect to investment advisors, the Commission may require that certain information be furnished or disseminated as necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors and advisory clients. To the extent determined by the Commission in its discretion, information furnished to clients or prospective clients of an investment advisor that would be in compliance with the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 and the rules thereunder may be used in whole or partial satisfaction of this requirement.

History.

1987, c. 678; 1997, c. 279.

§ 13.1-506.
Revocation of registration.

The Commission may, by order entered after a hearing on notice duly served on the defendant not less than thirty days before the date of the hearing, revoke the registration of a broker-dealer, investment advisor, investment advisor representative or agent, or refuse to renew a registration if an application for renewal has been or is to be filed, if it finds that such an order is in the public interest and that such broker-dealer, investment advisor or any partner, officer or director of such broker-dealer or investment advisor, or any person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, or any person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by such broker-dealer or investment advisor or that such agent or investment advisor representative:

Has engaged in any fraudulent transaction;

Is insolvent, or in danger of becoming insolvent, either in the sense that his liabilities exceed his assets or in the sense that he cannot meet his obligations as they mature;

Is a person for whom a conservator or guardian has been appointed and is acting;

Has been convicted, within or without this Commonwealth, of any misdemeanor involving a security or any aspect of the securities or investment advisory business or any felony;

Has failed to furnish information or records requested by the Commission concerning his conduct of the securities or investment advisory business; or

[Repealed.]

Has failed to conduct his securities or investment advisory business in accordance with the rules of the Commission.

History.

1956, c. 428; 1974, c. 479; 1981, c. 244; 1987, c. 678; 1997, c. 921.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 921, cl. 2, provides: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 1998. The powers granted and duties imposed pursuant to this act shall apply prospectively to guardians and conservators appointed by court order entered on or after that date, or modified on or after that date if the court so directs, without regard to when the petition was filed. The procedures specified in this act governing proceedings for appointment of a guardian or conservator or termination or other modification of a guardianship or conservatorship shall apply on and after that date without regard to when the petition therefor was filed or the guardianship or conservatorship created.”

The 1997 amendment,

effective January 1, 1998, in subdivision 3, deleted “Has been adjudicated mentally incompetent or” at the beginning of the subdivision and substituted “conservator” for “committee.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1464 (1974).